Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.080

Licensing—Other persons to whom chapter inapplicable.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person authorized under the laws of this state from performing any service for which the person may be licensed, nor prohibits any person from performing services as an electrologist if that person has been otherwise certified, registered, or trained as an electrologist.

This chapter does not apply to persons employed in the care or treatment of patients in hospitals or employed in the care of residents of nursing homes and similar residential care facilities.

[ 1984 c 208 s 19.]